District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-301.113

Immunity from civil liability for a volunteer of the corporation.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 6, 1962, Pub. L. 87-569, § 113
as added Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-222, § 2, 40 DCR 587
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-301.113.
1981 Ed., § 29-599.15.